Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 48 Miscellaneous Liens on Personal Property
18-48-802. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)(A)

“Base rent” means the rent designated in a lease as base rent, or a similar term, for the possession and use of commercial real estate.

(B)

“Base rent” does not include separate payments made by tenants for insurance, taxes, utilities, or other expenses;

(2)(A)

“Commercial real estate” means:

(i)

A fee simple, freehold, leasehold, or other title, interest, or possessory estate in real property located in the State of Arkansas; and

(ii)

Real property if the property is identified as commercial real estate in the representation agreement.

(B)

“Commercial real estate” does not mean an interest in real property that is:

(i)

Improved with one (1) single-family residential unit or one (1) multifamily structure with four (4) or fewer residential units; or

(ii)

Improved with single-family residential units such as condominiums, townhouses, timeshares, or houses in a subdivision that may be sold, leased, or otherwise disposed of on a unit-by-unit basis;

(3)

“Days” means calendar days;

(4)

“Disposition” means a voluntary transfer or conveyance of commercial real estate;

(5)

“Escrow closing agent” means the person or entity that receives documents and funds for recording and disbursement in the completion of a transaction for the disposition of commercial real estate;

(6)

“Lease” means a written agreement affecting commercial real estate that creates a landlord and tenant relationship under which the holder of a fee simple interest or possessory estate in commercial real estate permits another to possess the commercial real estate for the period of time contained in the lease;

(7)

“Licensee” means a licensee as defined in §17-42-103;

(8)(A)

“Net rental proceeds” means the base rent paid by the tenant under a lease less any amounts currently due under the terms of a lien that has priority over a lien created under this subchapter.

(B)

Net rental proceeds are personal property to which a lien created by this subchapter attaches;

(9)

“Owner” means a person or entity that is vested in record fee title or a possessory estate in commercial real estate;

(10)(A)

“Owner's net proceeds” means the gross sales proceeds from the disposition of commercial real estate described in a notice of claim of lien against proceeds under this subchapter less:

(i)

Amounts necessary to pay all encumbrances and liens that have priority over the lien created by this subchapter other than those permitted to remain by the buyer of the commercial real estate; and

(ii)

Owner's closing costs, such as real estate excise tax, title insurance premiums, real estate tax and assessment prorations, and escrow fees required to be paid by the owner under an agreement with the buyer of the commercial real estate.

(B)

“Owner's net proceeds” includes any gross sales proceeds that are:

(i)

Held by a third party for purposes of completing an exchange of real estate which is deferred from federal income tax under Section 1031 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as it existed on January 1, 2011, but are not used later for that purpose; and

(ii)

Personal property to which a lien created by this subchapter attaches;

(11)

“Principal broker” means a principal broker as defined in §17-42-103;

(12)

“Real property” means one (1) or more parcels or tracts of land, including an appurtenance or improvement; and

(13)

“Representation agreement” means a commercial real estate agreement between a licensee and an owner under which the owner agrees to pay a licensee a fee, commission, or other consideration upon:

(A)

Either the disposition or lease of commercial real estate; or

(B)

Entering into an agreement for the disposition or lease of commercial real estate.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1944, § 1; 2011, No. 340, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment substituted “means a licensee as defined” for “has the same meaning as” in (7); and inserted present (11) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

U.S. Code.

Section 1031 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, referred to in (10)(B)(i), is codified as 26 U.S.C. § 1031.

18-48-803. Lien upon personal property.

(a)(1)

A principal broker has a lien in the amount that the owner has agreed to pay the principal broker or real estate firm under a representation agreement upon:

(A)

The owner's net proceeds from the disposition of commercial real estate; and

(B)

The net rental proceeds from the lease of commercial real estate.

(2)

A lien created under subdivision (a)(1) of this section:

(A)

Encumbers only personal property;

(B)

Does not encumber real property; and

(C)

May:

(i)

Be asserted only by the principal broker identified in the representation agreement; and

(ii)

Not be assigned voluntarily or by operation of law.

(b)(1)

Subject to the requirements of subdivisions (b)(2) and (3) of this section, a lien created under subdivision (a)(1) of this section is:

(A)

Effective on the date of the recording of a notice of claim of lien upon proceeds in accordance with subdivision (b)(2) of this section; and

(B)

Perfected by recording the notice of claim of lien upon proceeds with the circuit clerk in the county or counties in which the commercial real estate is located.

(2)(A)

A lien created as the result of a disposition of commercial real estate is not effective unless it is recorded before the deed conveying the commercial real estate is recorded in the office of the circuit clerk in the county or counties in which the commercial real estate is located.

(B)

On or before the date the deed conveying the commercial real estate is recorded, the principal broker shall deliver a copy of the notice of claim of lien against proceeds to the escrow closing agent closing the disposition of commercial real estate in the manner provided in §18-48-806 if the identity of the escrow closing agent is known by the principal broker.

(3)

A lien created as the result of a lease of commercial real estate is:

(A)

Not effective unless it is recorded within ninety (90) days after:

(i)

The tenant takes possession of the leased commercial real estate; or

(ii)

For a renewal of a lease of commercial real estate, the commencement date of the renewal lease term; and

(B)

Null and void unless the principal broker delivers a copy of the notice of claim of lien against proceeds to the owner of the commercial real estate in the manner provided in §18-48-806 within ten (10) days of recording the principal broker's notice of claim of lien against proceeds.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1944, § 1; 2011, No. 340, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment substituted “principal broker” for “licensee” throughout the section; substituted “principal broker or real estate firm” for “licensee” in (a)(1); subdivided (a)(2); substituted “Encumbers only” for “Upon” in (a)(2)(A); substituted “Does not encumber” for “not upon” in (a)(2)(B); substituted “Be asserted only by the principal broker” for “Available only to the licensee” in (a)(2)(C)(i); substituted “§18-48-806” for “§18-48-807” in (b)(2)(B) and (b)(3)(B); deleted “actually” following “agent is” in (b)(2)(B); subdivided (b)(3)(A); substituted “within ninety (90) days after” for “before” in (b)(3)(A); and inserted (b)(3)(A)(ii).

18-48-804. Waiver of right to a lien — Action by principal broker.

(a)

A principal broker may waive his or her right to a lien under this subchapter in the representation agreement.

(b)

If a court finds that payment is due to the principal broker in an action to recover amounts due under a representation agreement in which the principal broker has waived his or her right to a lien, the court shall award actual damages, a reasonable attorney's fee, and expenses.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1944, § 1; 2011, No. 340, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment substituted “principal broker” for “licensee” in (a) and twice in (b).

18-48-805. Notice of claim of lien against proceeds.

(a)

A notice of claim of lien against proceeds shall state:

(1)

The name, address, and telephone number of the principal broker;

(2)

The date of the representation agreement;

(3)

The name of the owner of the commercial real estate;

(4)

The legal description of the commercial real estate as described in the representation agreement;

(5)

The amount of the claimed lien expressed as either a specified sum, a percentage of the sales price, or a formula;

(6)

The real estate license number of the principal broker;

(7)

That the lien claimant has read the notice of claim of lien, knows its contents, and believes:

(A)

The statements contained in the notice of claim of lien to be true and correct; and

(B)

That the claim is made pursuant to a valid representation agreement and is not frivolous; and

(8)

That the information contained in the notice of claim of lien is true and accurate to the knowledge of the signatory.

(b)

The notice of claim of lien against proceeds shall be notarized.

(c)

A copy of the representation agreement shall be attached to the notice of claim of lien against proceeds.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1944, § 1; 2011, No. 340, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment substituted “principal broker” for “licensee” in (a)(1) and (6).

18-48-806. Delivery of notice of claim of lien.

(a)

Except for service of a complaint under §18-48-807 or §18-48-808, a notice required to be delivered to a party under this subchapter shall be delivered by:

(1)

Any form of service of process permitted by Rule 4 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure;

(2)

Registered or certified mail, return receipt requested; or

(3)

Personal or electronic delivery and evidence of delivery in the form of a receipt or other paper or electronic acknowledgment by or from the party to whom the notice is delivered.

(b)

Delivery of the notice is effective at the time of:

(1)

Personal service;

(2)

Personal or electronic delivery; or

(3)

Three (3) days after deposit in the mail.

(c)(1)

Notice to a principal broker or owner of commercial real estate may be sent to:

(A)

The address of the principal broker or owner that is provided in the representation agreement; or

(B)

Any other address contained in a written notice from the principal broker or owner to the party giving the notice.

(2)

If no address can be found under the provisions of subdivision (c)(1) of this section, the notice may be given to:

(A)

The principal broker at his or her most recent address of record with the Arkansas Real Estate Commission; and

(B)

The owner at the address of the owner's commercial real estate.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1944, § 1; 2011, No. 340, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “a complaint under §18-48-807 or §18-48-808” for “process as required in a civil action subject to the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure”, inserted “required”, and inserted “delivered” following “shall be”; substituted “Any form of service of process permitted by Rule 4 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure” for “Service of process” in (a)(1); deleted (a)(4); and substituted “principal broker” for “licensee” throughout (c).

18-48-807. Release of notice of claim of lien.

(a)

If a principal broker records a notice of claim of lien against proceeds and knows or learns that he or she is not entitled to receive compensation under the terms of the representation agreement, the principal broker shall record a written release of the notice of claim of lien against proceeds within five (5) days after:

(1)

Demand by the owner of the commercial real estate; or

(2)

Learning that the principal broker is not entitled to receive compensation under the terms of the representation agreement.

(b)

If the amount claimed in the notice of claim of lien has been paid, a lien claimant shall promptly record a satisfaction or release of the notice of claim of lien within five (5) days after receipt of payment of the amount claimed in the notice of claim of lien.

(c)(1)

In a disposition of commercial real estate, the escrow closing agent shall pay to the lien claimant the owner's net proceeds up to the amount claimed in the notice of claim of lien against proceeds.

(2)

If the amount claimed in the notice of claim of lien is to be fully or partially paid to the lien claimant by the escrow closing agent upon disposition, the lien claimant shall submit a release of his or her notice of claim of lien against proceeds to the escrow closing agent who shall hold the release in escrow pending disposition and payment.

(d)(1)(A)

A notice of claim of lien against proceeds recorded under this subchapter shall be released upon the recording of a receipt by the office in which the notice of claim of lien was recorded that shows a deposit of an amount equal to the lien claimed.

(B)

The deposit shall be held pending a resolution of amounts due to the licensee and the owner.

(2)

If the court determines in an action by the owner to compel delivery of the release by the lien claimant that the delay in providing the release was unjustified, the court shall:

(A)

Order the release of the notice of claim of lien; and

(B)

Award the owner the costs of the action, including a reasonable attorney's fee.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1944, § 1; 2011, No. 340, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment subdivided (a); in (a)(1), substituted “principal broker” for “licensee” twice and inserted “or learns”; inserted (a)(2); and inserted “the owner” in (d)(2)(B).

18-48-808. Disputed claim — Order to show cause.

(a)(1)

An owner of commercial real estate may dispute a recorded notice of claim of lien against proceeds filed under this subchapter by filing a complaint in the circuit court of the county where the commercial real estate or a portion of the commercial real estate is located for an order directing the principal broker to appear before the court and show cause why a release of the notice of claim of lien against proceeds should not be granted.

(2)

If after a hearing, a court determines that the owner is:

(A)

Not obligated to pay the principal broker a commission under the terms of a representation agreement, it shall issue an order:

(i)

Releasing the notice of claim of lien against proceeds; and

(ii)

Awarding costs and a reasonable attorney's fee to the owner; or

(B)

Obligated to pay the principal broker a commission under the terms of a representation agreement, the court shall issue an order awarding costs and a reasonable attorney's fee to the licensee.

(b)(1)

A principal broker who has a lien on net rental proceeds under §18-48-803, has recorded a notice of claim of lien against proceeds, and has complied with the requirements of this subchapter may file a complaint in the circuit court of the county where the commercial real estate or a portion of the commercial real estate is located for an order directing the owner to appear before the court and show cause why the relief requested in the complaint should not be granted.

(2)

If after a hearing, the court determines that the owner is:

(A)

Obligated to pay the principal broker a commission under the terms of a representation agreement, the court shall:

(i)

Issue an order enjoining the owner from paying the net rental proceeds from the lease to any party other than the principal broker;

(ii)

Order the owner to pay the net rental proceeds to the principal broker; and

(iii)

Award a reasonable attorney's fee and expenses to the principal broker; or

(B)

Not obligated to pay the licensee a commission under the terms of a representation agreement, the court shall issue an order awarding a reasonable attorney's fee and expenses to the owner.

(c)(1)

A complaint authorized by subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section is barred if not filed within twelve (12) months of the date that the notice of claim of lien against proceeds was recorded.

(2)

A proceeding under this section shall not affect other rights and remedies available to the parties under this subchapter or otherwise.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1944, § 1; 2011, No. 340, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment substituted “principal broker” for “licensee” throughout the section; in (a)(1), deleted “or a licensee who has a lien on net proceeds under §18-48-803, has recorded a notice of claim of lien against proceeds, and has complied with the requirements of this subchapter” following the first occurrence of “real estate”; and substituted “is barred if not filed” for “shall be filed” in (c)(1).

18-48-809. Priority of lien claims.

If perfected prior to the recording of a notice of claim of lien against proceeds, the following liens have priority over a lien created under this subchapter:

(1)

Statutory liens, mortgages, deeds of trust, assignments of rents, and other encumbrances, including all advances or charges made or accruing under statutory liens, mortgages, deeds of trust, assignments of rents, and other encumbrances, whether voluntary or obligatory; and

(2)

Modifications, extensions, renewals, and replacements to any of the liens listed in subdivision (1) of this section.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1944, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Section18-48-809 was omitted from Acts 2011, No. 340, which purported to amend the entire subchapter. A.C.R.C. has determined that it was not the intent to repeal §
18-48-809 and its omission was likely a clerical error.